Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB151.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 602-B of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, is amended by adding definitions to read:12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728 Section 602-B. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Poverty impact analysis." An analysis of:(1) A proposed budget that includes:(i) A projected ratio equal to the amount of appropriations in the proposed budget that will benefit individuals and families below the poverty threshold over the total amount of appropriations in the proposed budget.(ii) A projection of the number of individual and family incomes that may:(A) decrease below the poverty threshold if the proposed budget is enacted; or(B) increase above the poverty threshold if the proposed budget is enacted.(iii) A projection as to how the proposed budget improves or reduces access to basic human services, including health care, housing and education.(2) An enacted budget that includes:(i) A projected ratio equal to the amount of appropriations in the proposed budget that will benefit individuals and families below the poverty threshold over the total amount of appropriations in the proposed budget.(ii) A projection of the number of individual and family incomes that may:(A) decrease below the poverty threshold if the 20250SB0151PN0180 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 proposed budget is enacted; or(B) increase above the poverty threshold if the proposed budget is enacted.(iii) A projection as to how the proposed budget improves or reduces access to basic human services, including health care, housing and education.(3) Any bill, amendment or joint resolution to determine the impact, if any, the proposed bill, amendment or joint resolution may have on the poverty and deep poverty rate of this Commonwealth."Poverty threshold." Household income level below 200% of the Federal poverty level.* * *Section 2. Section 604-B(a) of the act is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 604-B. Duties of office.(a) Mandatory.--The office shall:* * *(4.1) Conduct a poverty impact analysis authorized under section 616-B.* * *Section 3. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 616-B. Poverty impact analysis.(a) Analysis required.--The office shall conduct a poverty impact analysis of the following:(1) The Governor's proposed General Fund Budget, which shall be completed by May 1 of each year.(2) The enacted General Fund Budget of the fiscal year, which shall be completed within 90 days after the enactment of the General Fund Budget.20250SB0151PN0180 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) Any bill, amendment or joint resolution on written request of a requesting officer. (b) Second consideration prohibited.--Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d)(1), a bill for which a poverty impact analysis has been requested under subsection (a)(3) may not be given second consideration by the chamber of the General Assembly whose member made the request until the office has attached the poverty impact analysis.(c) Amendment.--Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d)(2), an amendment for which a poverty impact analysis has been requested under subsection (a)(3) or the bill to which the amendment is offered may not be considered by the chamber of the General Assembly whose member made the request until the office has attached a poverty impact analysis.(d) Failure to attach.--(1) If the office fails to attach a poverty impact analysis to a bill within 10 legislative days after a request for a statement has been submitted to the office, the bill may be further considered in the same manner as if the analysis were attached to the bill.(2) If the office fails to attach a poverty impact analysis to an amendment within 10 legislative days after a request for a statement has been submitted to the office, the bill and the amendment may be considered in the same manner as if the analysis were attached to the amendment.(e) Readability.-- The poverty impact statement shall be impartial, simple and understandable.Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0151PN0180 - 4 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728